Maine, session 132, LD779.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Transfer to Department of Health and Human Services, Office of
Behavioral Health. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before
June 30, 2027, the State Controller shall transfer $561,283 from the Department of Health
and Human Services, Opioid Use Disorder Prevention and Treatment Fund, Other Special
Revenue Funds account to the Department of Health and Human Services, Office of
Behavioral Health, Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Sec. 2. Transfer to unappropriated surplus of General Fund.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2027, the State
Controller shall transfer $179,500 from the Department of Health and Human Services,
Opioid Use Disorder Prevention and Treatment Fund, Other Special Revenue Funds
account to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ATTORNEY GENERAL, DEPARTMENT OF THE
District Attorneys Salaries 0409
Initiative: Appropriates one-time funds to establish one limited-period Assistant District
Attorney position to facilitate the creation of a drug treatment court in Aroostook County.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $140,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $140,500
ATTORNEY GENERAL, DEPARTMENT OF THE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $140,500
Page 1 - 132LR2076(03)

__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $140,500
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Office of Behavioral Health Z199
Initiative: Provides one-time allocation for the Office of Behavioral Health to contract with
an entity to provide the required pretrial services for the new drug treatment court in
Aroostook County.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $561,283
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $561,283
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $561,283
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $561,283
PUBLIC DEFENSE SERVICES, MAINE COMMISSION ON
Maine Commission on Public Defense Services Z112
Initiative: Appropriates one-time funds to provide legal representation to participants in the
new drug treatment court in Aroostook County.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $39,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $39,000
PUBLIC DEFENSE SERVICES, MAINE
COMMISSION ON
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $39,000
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $39,000
SECTION TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $179,500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $561,283
__________ __________
SECTION TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $740,783
Page 2 - 132LR2076(03)